Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB847.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13(f) of the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Penalties and remedies.* * *(f) Preenforcement conference.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, before the department, the Office of Attorney General or the district attorney of the affected county shall institute any criminal proceedings against any person pursuant to subsections (c), (d) and (e) it shall, in writing, 123456789101112131415161718 provide such person with an opportunity for a preenforcement conference with the department.(f.1) Criminal proceedings.--The Office of Attorney General under the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, or the district attorney of the affected county may institute any criminal proceedings against any person pursuant to subsections (c), (d) and (e).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0847PN0877 - 2 - 123456789